Wyoming, session 2026, SF0095.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-1-205 is created to read:
31-1-205. Third party providers; motor vehicle
division partner program.
(a) The department may enter into agreements with
third party providers to administer written, driving and
skills tests for driver's licenses and administer motor
vehicle services.
(b) The department may establish a motor vehicle
division partner program to allow third party providers to
conduct specified driver's license and motor vehicle
services.
(c) The department shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section, including but not
limited to:
(i) Establishing criteria for the qualifications
and certifications of third party providers;
(ii) If a motor vehicle division partner program
is established, defining the scope of services that may be
provided by third party providers under the program;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0095
ENROLLED ACT NO. 49, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Establishing requirements for training,
background checks and bonding of third party providers;
(iv) Ensuring compliance of third party
providers with all applicable federal and state laws, rules
and regulations, including but not limited to the federal
motor carrier safety administration's regulations for
commercial driver's license testing and applicable
provisions of the Wyoming administrative code;
(v) Establishing procedures for monitoring and
auditing the activities of third party providers to ensure
the integrity and security of driver's license and motor
vehicle services;
(vi) Defining the terms and conditions of
agreements between the department and third party
providers;
(vii) Establishing fees and compensation
structures for services provided by third party providers;
(viii) Establishing procedures for the
suspension or revocation of third party provider services
for noncompliance with department rules or agreement
conditions.
(d) A third party provider acting under the authority
granted by this section shall not be considered a
governmental entity.
Section 2. W.S. 31-1-203(b) and 31-7-114(f)(intro)
are amended to read:
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0095
ENROLLED ACT NO. 49, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
31-1-203. Special enforcement officers; summons and
notice to appear for violations; deposit for appearance;
disposition of deposit.
(b) Employees designated under subsection (a) of this
section may issue summons for violations of W.S. 31-1-205,
31-4-101, 31-7-106, 31-7-133, 31-18-101 through 31-18-603,
31-18-701, 31-18-801 through 31-18-808 and 39-17-208.
31-7-114. Examinations; visual acuity.
(f) The department may authorize a person, including
an agency of this or another state, an employer, a third
party provider pursuant to W.S. 31-1-205, a private driver
training facility or other private institution, or a
department, agency or instrumentality of local government
including fire departments to administer the skills test
specified by subsection (a) of this section, provided:
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0095
ENROLLED ACT NO. 49, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4